Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2033.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-107.5 of Title 63, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
for the State Department of Health to be designated the "Community
Health Center Access to Care Revolving Fund". The fund shall be a
continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall
consist of all monies directed for deposit to the fund by law. All
monies accruing to the credit of said fund are hereby appropriated
Req. No. 13196 Page 1

and may be budgeted and expended by the Department for the purpose
of increasing access to care provided by community health centers
authorized by the Public Health Service Act, 42 U.S.C., Section 330.
Expenditures from said fund shall be made upon warrants issued by
the State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with
the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for
approval and payment.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-13196 GRS 03/05/25










Req. No. 13196 Page 2